Nevada, session 83, SB12.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. NRS 239.073 is hereby amended to read as follows:
239.073 1. The Committee to Approve Schedules for the
Retention and Disposition of Official State Records, consisting of
six members, is hereby created.
2. The Committee consists of:
(a) The Secretary of State;
(b) The Attorney General;
(c) The Director of the Department of Administration;
(d) The State Library, Archives and Public Records
Administrator;
(e) The Chief of the Governor’s Technology Office [of the
Chief Information Officer] within the Office of the Governor; and
(f) One member who is a representative of the general public
appointed by the Governor.
 All members of the Committee, except the representative of the
general public, are ex officio members of the Committee.
3. The Secretary of State or a person designated by the
Secretary of State shall serve as Chair of the Committee. The State
Library, Archives and Public Records Administrator shall serve as
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 3 –
Secretary of the Committee and prepare and maintain the records of
the Committee.
4. The Committee shall meet at least quarterly and may meet
upon the call of the Chair.
5. An ex officio member of the Committee may designate a
person to represent the ex officio member at any meeting of the
Committee. The person designated may exercise all the duties,
rights and privileges of the member that the person represents.
6. The Committee may adopt rules and regulations for its
management.
Sec. 2. NRS 242.011 is hereby amended to read as follows:
242.011 As used in this chapter, unless the context otherwise
requires, the words and terms defined in NRS [242.013] 242.015 to
242.068, inclusive, have the meanings ascribed to them in those
sections.
Sec. 3. NRS 242.017 is hereby amended to read as follows:
242.017 “Chief” or “Chief Information Officer” means the
Chief of the Governor’s Technology Office [of the Chief
Information Officer] within the Office of the Governor.
Sec. 4. NRS 242.062 is hereby amended to read as follows:
242.062 “Office” means the Governor’s Technology Office [of
the Chief Information Officer] within the Office of the Governor.
Sec. 5. NRS 242.071 is hereby amended to read as follows:
242.071 1. The Legislature hereby determines and declares
that the creation of the Governor’s Technology Office [of the Chief
Information Officer] within the Office of the Governor is necessary
for the coordinated, orderly and economical processing of data and
information in State Government, to ensure economical use of
information systems and to prevent the unnecessary proliferation of
equipment and personnel among the various state agencies.
2. The purposes of the Office are:
(a) To perform information services for state agencies.
(b) To provide technical advice but not administrative control of
the information systems within the state agencies and, as authorized,
of local governmental agencies.
Sec. 6. NRS 242.080 is hereby amended to read as follows:
242.080 1. The Governor’s Technology Office [of the Chief
Information Officer] is hereby created within the Office of the
Governor.
2. The Office consists of the Chief Information Officer and:
(a) The [Administration Unit.] Director’s Office. The Chief is
the head of the [Administration Unit.] Director’s Office.
(b) The Client Services [Unit.] Division.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 4 –
(c) The Computing Services [Unit.] Division.
(d) The Network Services [Unit.] Division.
(e) The Office of Information Security.
(f) Other units, groups, divisions or departments deemed
necessary by the Chief to the extent such functions are supported by
the appropriations allocated to the functions of the Office.
3. A Network Transport Services [Group] Unit and a
[Telecommunications Group] Unified Communications Unit are
hereby created within the Network Services [Unit] Division of the
Office.
Sec. 7. NRS 242.101 is hereby amended to read as follows:
242.101 1. The Chief Information Officer shall:
(a) Appoint a Deputy Chief of the Office of Information
Security who is in the [classified] unclassified service of the State;
(b) Administer the provisions of this chapter and other
provisions of law relating to the duties of the Governor’s
Technology Office ; [of the Chief Information Officer;]
(c) Employ, within the limits of the approved budget of the
Office, such other staff as is necessary for the performance of the
duties of the Office; and
(d) Carry out other duties and exercise other powers specified by
law.
2. The Chief may form committees to establish standards and
determine criteria for evaluation of policies relating to informational
services.
Sec. 8. NRS 242.122 is hereby amended to read as follows:
242.122 1. There is hereby created an Information
Technology Advisory Board. The Board consists of:
(a) One member appointed by the Majority Floor Leader of the
Senate from the membership of the Senate Standing Committee on
Finance.
(b) One member appointed by the Speaker of the Assembly
from the membership of the Assembly Standing Committee on
Ways and Means.
(c) Two representatives of using agencies which are major users
of the services of the Office. The Governor shall appoint the two
representatives. Each such representative serves for a term of 4
years. For the purposes of this paragraph, an agency is a “major
user” if it is among the top five users of the services of the Office,
based on the amount of money paid by each agency for the services
of the Office during the immediately preceding biennium.
(d) The [Director] Chief of the [Department] Office or his or her
designee.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 5 –
(e) The Attorney General or his or her designee.
(f) Five persons appointed by the Governor as follows:
(1) Three persons who represent a city or county in this
State, at least one of whom is engaged in information technology or
information security; and
(2) Two persons who represent the information technology
industry but who:
(I) Are not employed by this State;
(II) Do not hold any elected or appointed office in State
Government;
(III) Do not have an existing contract or other agreement
to provide information services, systems or technology to an agency
of this State; and
(IV) Are independent of and have no direct or indirect
pecuniary interest in a corporation, association, partnership or other
business organization which provides information services, systems
or technology to an agency of this State.
2. Each person appointed pursuant to paragraph (f) of
subsection 1 serves for a term of 4 years. No person so appointed
may serve more than 2 consecutive terms.
3. At the first regular meeting of each calendar year, the
members of the Board shall elect a Chair by majority vote.
Sec. 9. NRS 242.183 is hereby amended to read as follows:
242.183 1. The Deputy Chief of the Office of Information
Security shall investigate and resolve any breach of an information
system of a state agency or elected officer that uses the equipment
or services of the Governor’s Technology Office [of the Chief
Information Officer] or an application of such an information
system or unauthorized acquisition of computerized data that
materially compromises the security, confidentiality or integrity of
such an information system.
2. The Chief Information Officer or Deputy Chief of the Office
of Information Security, at his or her discretion, may inform
members of the Technological Crime Advisory Board created by
NRS 205A.040, the Nevada Commission on Homeland Security
created by NRS 239C.120 and the Information Technology
Advisory Board created by NRS 242.122 of any breach of an
information system of a state agency or elected officer or
application of such an information system or unauthorized
acquisition of computerized data or information that materially
compromises the security, confidentiality or integrity of such an
information system.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 6 –
Sec. 10. NRS 242.191 is hereby amended to read as follows:
242.191 1. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 3, the
amount receivable from a state agency or officer or local
governmental agency which uses the services of the Office must be
determined by the Chief in each case and include:
(a) The annual expense, including depreciation, of operating and
maintaining the Network Services [Unit,] Division, distributed
among the agencies in proportion to the services performed for each
agency.
(b) A service charge in an amount determined by distributing the
monthly installment for the construction costs of the computer
facility among the agencies in proportion to the services performed
for each agency.
2. The Chief shall prepare and submit monthly to the state
agencies and officers and local governmental agencies for which
services of the Office have been performed an itemized statement of
the amount receivable from each state agency or officer or local
governmental agency.
3. The Chief may authorize, if in his or her judgment the
circumstances warrant, a fixed cost billing, including a factor for
depreciation, for services rendered to a state agency or officer or
local governmental agency.
Sec. 11. NRS 205.4765 is hereby amended to read as follows:
205.4765 1. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 6, a
person who knowingly, willfully and without authorization:
(a) Modifies;
(b) Damages;
(c) Destroys;
(d) Discloses;
(e) Uses;
(f) Transfers;
(g) Conceals;
(h) Takes;
(i) Retains possession of;
(j) Copies;
(k) Obtains or attempts to obtain access to, permits access to or
causes to be accessed; or
(l) Enters,
 data, a program or any supporting documents which exist inside
or outside a computer, system or network is guilty of a
misdemeanor.
2. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 6, a person who
knowingly, willfully and without authorization:
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 7 –
(a) Modifies;
(b) Destroys;
(c) Uses;
(d) Takes;
(e) Damages;
(f) Transfers;
(g) Conceals;
(h) Copies;
(i) Retains possession of; or
(j) Obtains or attempts to obtain access to, permits access to or
causes to be accessed,
 equipment or supplies that are used or intended to be used in a
computer, system or network is guilty of a misdemeanor.
3. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 6, a person who
knowingly, willfully and without authorization:
(a) Destroys;
(b) Damages;
(c) Takes;
(d) Alters;
(e) Transfers;
(f) Discloses;
(g) Conceals;
(h) Copies;
(i) Uses;
(j) Retains possession of; or
(k) Obtains or attempts to obtain access to, permits access to or
causes to be accessed,
 a computer, system or network is guilty of a misdemeanor.
4. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 6, a person who
knowingly, willfully and without authorization:
(a) Obtains and discloses;
(b) Publishes;
(c) Transfers; or
(d) Uses,
 a device used to access a computer, network or data is guilty of a
misdemeanor.
5. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 6, a person who
knowingly, willfully and without authorization introduces, causes to
be introduced or attempts to introduce a computer contaminant into
a computer, system or network is guilty of a misdemeanor.
6. If the violation of any provision of this section:
(a) Was committed to devise or execute a scheme to defraud or
illegally obtain property;
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 8 –
(b) Caused response costs, loss, injury or other damage in excess
of $500; or
(c) Caused an interruption or impairment of a public service,
including, without limitation, a governmental operation, a system of
public communication or transportation or a supply of water, gas or
electricity,
 the person is guilty of a category C felony and shall be punished
as provided in NRS 193.130, and may be further punished by a fine
of not more than $100,000. In addition to any other penalty, the
court shall order the person to pay restitution.
7. The provisions of this section do not apply to a person
performing any testing, including, without limitation, penetration
testing, of an information system of an agency that uses the
equipment or services of the Governor’s Technology Office [of the
Chief Information Officer] within the Office of the Governor that is
authorized by the Chief [of that Office] Information Officer or the
head of the Office of Information Security of the Governor’s
Technology Office . [of the Chief Information Officer.] As used in
this subsection:
(a) “Information system” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 242.057.
(b) “Penetration testing” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 242.171.
Sec. 12. NRS 205A.040 is hereby amended to read as follows:
205A.040 1. The Technological Crime Advisory Board is
hereby created.
2. The Board consists of 13 members as follows:
(a) The Attorney General.
(b) The Chief Information Officer of the Governor’s
Technology Office [of the Chief Information Officer] within the
Office of the Governor.
(c) One member of the Senate appointed by the Majority Leader
of the Senate.
(d) One member of the Assembly appointed by the Speaker of
the Assembly.
(e) Nine other persons appointed by the Governor as follows:
(1) Two or more persons who represent major sectors of the
economy of this State that are impacted significantly by
technological crimes.
(2) One or more persons who are employees of a law
enforcement agency of this State.
(3) One or more persons who are employees of a public
educational institution within this State.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 9 –
(4) One or more persons who are residents of this State and
who are employed by the Federal Government.
3. Each member of the Board who is appointed to the Board
serves for a term of 4 years. A vacancy on the Board in an appointed
position must be filled in the same manner as the original
appointment. A member may be reappointed to the Board.
4. The members of the Board shall elect a Chair and Vice Chair
by majority vote. After the initial election, the Chair and Vice Chair
shall hold office for a term of 1 year beginning on July 1 of each
year. If the position of Chair or Vice Chair becomes vacant, the
members of the Board shall elect a Chair or Vice Chair, as
appropriate, from among its members for the remainder of the
unexpired term.
5. The members of the Board:
(a) Serve without compensation; and
(b) May, upon written request, receive the per diem allowance
and travel expenses provided for state officers and employees
generally while engaged in the business of the Board.
6. A member of the Board who is an officer or employee of
this State or a political subdivision of this State must be relieved
from duties without loss of regular compensation so that the officer
or employee may prepare for and attend meetings of the Board and
perform any work necessary to carry out the duties of the Board in
the most timely manner practicable. A state agency or political
subdivision of this State shall not require an officer or employee
who is a member of the Board to make up the time the officer or
employee is absent from work to carry out duties as a member of the
Board or use annual vacation or compensatory time for the absence.
Sec. 13. NRS 205A.050 is hereby amended to read as follows:
205A.050 1. The Board shall meet at least once every quarter
and at the times and places specified by a call of the Chair or a
majority of the members of the Board.
2. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 3, a member of
the Board may designate in writing a person to represent him or her
at a meeting of the Board if it is impractical for the member of the
Board to attend the meeting. A representative who has been so
designated:
(a) Shall be deemed to be a member of the Board for the purpose
of determining a quorum at the meeting; and
(b) May vote on any matter that is voted on by the regular
members of the Board at the meeting.
3. The Attorney General may designate a representative to
serve in his or her place on the Board or attend a meeting of the
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 10 –
Board in his or her place. The Chief Information Officer of the
Governor’s Technology Office [of the Chief Information Officer]
within the Office of the Governor may designate a representative to
serve in his or her place on the Board or attend a meeting of the
Board in his or her place.
4. Seven members of the Board constitute a quorum. Except as
otherwise provided in NRS 205A.070 and 205A.080, a quorum may
exercise all the power and authority conferred on the Board.
5. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, a member of
the Board:
(a) Is not disqualified from public employment or holding a
public office because of membership on the Board; and
(b) Does not forfeit public office or public employment because
of membership on the Board.
Sec. 14. NRS 205A.060 is hereby amended to read as follows:
205A.060 The Board shall:
1. Facilitate cooperation between state, local and federal
officers in detecting, investigating and prosecuting technological
crimes.
2. Establish, support and assist in the coordination of activities
between two multiagency task forces on technological crime, one
based in Reno and one based in Las Vegas, consisting of
investigators and forensic examiners who are specifically trained to
investigate technological crimes.
3. Coordinate and provide training and education for members
of the general public, private industry and governmental agencies,
including, without limitation, law enforcement agencies, concerning
the statistics and methods of technological crimes and how to
prevent, detect and investigate technological crimes.
4. Assist the Governor’s Technology Office [of the Chief
Information Officer] within the Office of the Governor in securing
governmental information systems against illegal intrusions and
other criminal activities.
5. Evaluate and recommend changes to the existing civil and
criminal laws relating to technological crimes in response to current
and projected changes in technology and law enforcement
techniques.
6. Distribute money deposited pursuant to NRS 179.1233 into
the Account for the Technological Crime Advisory Board in
accordance with the provisions of NRS 205A.090.
7. Authorize the payment of expenses incurred by the Board in
carrying out its duties pursuant to this chapter.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 11 –
Sec. 15. NRS 233F.010 is hereby amended to read as follows:
233F.010 As used in this chapter, unless the context otherwise
requires, the words and terms defined in NRS [233F.015] 233F.020
to 233F.065, inclusive, have the meanings ascribed to them in those
sections.
Sec. 16. NRS 233F.035 is hereby amended to read as follows:
233F.035 “Chief” means the Chief Information Officer of the
Governor’s Technology Office within the Office of the Governor.
Sec. 17. NRS 233F.0593 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
233F.0593 “Network Transport Services [Group”] Unit”
means the Network Transport Services [Group] Unit of the Network
Services [Unit] Division of the Office.
Sec. 18. NRS 233F.0595 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
233F.0595 “Office” means the Governor’s Technology Office
[of the Chief Information Officer] within the Office of the
Governor.
Sec. 19. NRS 233F.065 is hereby amended to read as follows:
233F.065 [“Telecommunications Group”] “Unified
Communications Unit” means the [Telecommunications Group]
Unified Communications Unit of the Network Services [Unit]
Division of the Office.
Sec. 20. NRS 233F.117 is hereby amended to read as follows:
233F.117 If a state agency other than the Network Transport
Services [Group] Unit adds equipment which extends the state
communications system to another location, the extension, if
approved by the Chief, becomes part of the state communications
system. An approved extension of the system is subject to the
provisions of this chapter relating to the system.
Sec. 21. NRS 233F.260 is hereby amended to read as follows:
233F.260 The Board shall provide advice to the
[Telecommunications Group] Unified Communications Unit on the
use of telecommunications by the State Government, including:
1. The development of policies, standards, plans and designs;
2. The procurement of systems, facilities and services;
3. The integration of telecommunications systems with other
state and local governmental systems; and
4. New technology that may become or is available.
Sec. 22. NRS 233F.270 is hereby amended to read as follows:
233F.270 1. The [Telecommunications Group,] Unified
Communications Unit, with the advice of the Board, shall:
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 12 –
(a) Plan, carry out and administer a state telecommunications
system. When available at a competitive cost, the
[Telecommunications Group] Unified Communications Unit shall
use the facilities of telephone companies providing local exchange
service.
(b) Make arrangements for the installation of a central telephone
switchboard or switchboards to serve the state offices in one or more
buildings as may be practical or feasible.
2. The system must be integrated and may include services
between the State and any cities, counties and schools.
3. The Office may consider for the system all the
telecommunications requirements of the State and its political
subdivisions.
Sec. 23. NRS 408.55028 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
408.55028 1. The Telecommunications Advisory Council is
hereby created.
2. The Council consists of seven members appointed by the
Governor. The Governor shall appoint to the Council:
(a) One member from the Office of Science, Innovation and
Technology in the Office of the Governor;
(b) One member from the Department of Transportation;
(c) One member from the Department of Education;
(d) One member from the Nevada Office of Rural Health;
(e) One member from the Department of Public Safety;
(f) One member from the Nevada System of Higher Education;
and
(g) One member from the Governor’s Technology Office [of
the Chief Information Officer] within the Office of the Governor.
3. The member appointed from the Office of Science,
Innovation and Technology in the Office of the Governor shall serve
as the Chair of the Council.
4. The Council shall meet as necessary at the call of the Chair.
5. The Director of the Office of Science, Innovation and
Technology in the Office of the Governor shall provide staff support
to the Council.
6. A majority of the members of the Council constitutes a
quorum for the transaction of business.
7. The members of the Council receive no compensation for
their services, but are entitled to be reimbursed for all travel and
other expenses actually and necessarily incurred by them in the
performance of their duties, within the limits of money available to
the Council.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 13 –
8. The members of the Council may request assistance from
technical advisors as the Council deems necessary.
9. The Council shall:
(a) Provide information, advice, strategic plans, priorities and
recommendations to assist the Department in administering access
to rights-of-way to telecommunications providers for statewide
telecommunications purposes;
(b) Assist the Department in valuing in-kind compensation
pursuant to NRS 408.5501 to 408.55029, inclusive, and approve or
deny any valuation thereof;
(c) Seek input from telecommunications providers and the
public relating to broadband access;
(d) Coordinate and exchange information with other entities of
this State and its political subdivisions relating to technology and
telecommunications;
(e) Approve or deny any agreement between the Department and
a telecommunications provider proposed pursuant to NRS 408.5502,
if the Council finds that the agreement is competitively neutral and
nondiscriminatory; and
(f) Provide other assistance as requested by the Department.
Sec. 24. NRS 439.942 is hereby amended to read as follows:
439.942 1. The Division may establish a secure Internet
website which makes certain information available for a website
client to conduct an investigation into the background and personal
history of a person that is required pursuant to the provisions of this
chapter or chapter 62B, 63, 424, 427A, 432, 432A, 432B, 433,
433B, 435 or 449 of NRS.
2. To become a website client, a person or governmental entity
must:
(a) Create an account on the Internet website;
(b) Comply with NRS 439.942 to 439.948, inclusive, and any
regulations adopted pursuant thereto governing use of the Internet
website; and
(c) Designate a website client administrator who is responsible
for:
(1) Determining the persons who are authorized to use the
Internet website;
(2) Providing the Division with the names of the persons
who are authorized to use the Internet website;
(3) Ensuring that only those authorized persons have access
to the Internet website; and
(4) Notifying the Division of any change in the persons who
are authorized to use the Internet website.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 14 –
3. Authorized employees of the Division and of the
Department of Public Safety may be designated to serve as
administrators of the Internet website with access to all the data and
information on the Internet website.
4. Except as otherwise provided in this section and NRS
239.0115, information collected, maintained, stored, backed up or
on file on the Internet website is confidential, not subject to
subpoena or discovery and is not subject to inspection by the general
public.
5. The Division shall ensure that any information collected,
maintained and stored on the Internet website is protected
adequately from fire, theft, loss, destruction, other hazards and
unauthorized access, and is backed-up in a manner that ensures
proper confidentiality and security.
6. The Internet website must be maintained in accordance with
any requirements of the Governor’s Technology Office [of the
Chief Information Officer] within the Office of the Governor
established for use of the equipment or services of the Office
pursuant to NRS 242.181.
Sec. 25. NRS 459.742 is hereby amended to read as follows:
459.742 The Commission, in carrying out its duties and within
the limits of legislative appropriations and other available money,
may:
1. Enter into contracts, leases or other agreements or
transactions;
2. Provide grants of money to local emergency planning
committees to improve their ability to respond to emergencies
involving hazardous materials;
3. Assist with the development of comprehensive plans for
responding to such emergencies in this State;
4. Provide technical assistance and administrative support to
the [Telecommunications Group] Unified Communications Unit of
the Network Services [Unit] Division of the Governor’s
Technology Office [of the Chief Information Officer] within the
Office of the Governor for the development of systems for
communication during such emergencies;
5. Provide technical and administrative support and assistance
for training programs;
6. Develop a system to provide public access to data relating to
hazardous materials;
7. Support any activity or program eligible to receive money
from the Contingency Account for Hazardous Materials;
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 15 –
8. Approve programs developed to address planning for and
responding to emergencies involving hazardous materials; and
9. Coordinate the activities administered by state agencies to
carry out the provisions of this chapter, 42 U.S.C. §§ 11001 et seq.
and 49 U.S.C. §§ 5101 et seq.
Sec. 26. NRS 480.926 is hereby amended to read as follows:
480.926 The Office shall:
1. Establish partnerships with:
(a) Local governments;
(b) The Nevada System of Higher Education; and
(c) Private entities, to the extent practicable,
 to encourage the development of strategies to prepare for and
mitigate risks to, and otherwise protect, the security of information
systems that are operated or maintained by a public or private entity
in this State.
2. Establish partnerships to assist and receive assistance from
local governments and appropriate agencies of the Federal
Government regarding the development of strategies to prepare for
and mitigate risks to, and otherwise protect, the security of
information systems.
3. Consult with the Division of Emergency Management of the
Office of the Military and the Governor’s Technology Office [of the
Chief Information Officer] within the Office of the Governor
regarding the development of strategies to prepare for and mitigate
risks to, and otherwise protect, the security of information systems.
4. Coordinate with the Investigation Division of the
Department regarding gathering intelligence on and initiating
investigations of cyber threats and incidents.
Sec. 27. NRS 493.118 is hereby amended to read as follows:
493.118 1. The Department shall, to the extent that money is
available for this purpose, establish and maintain a registry of
unmanned aerial vehicles that are operated by public agencies in this
State. The Department shall include on its Internet website the
information that is maintained in the registry.
2. A public agency shall, for each unmanned aerial vehicle the
public agency intends to operate, submit to the Department, on a
form provided by the Department, for inclusion in the registry:
(a) The name of the public agency;
(b) The name and contact information of each operator of the
unmanned aerial vehicle;
(c) Sufficient information to identify the unmanned aerial
vehicle; and
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 16 –
(d) A statement describing the use of the unmanned aerial
vehicle by the public agency.
3. The Department shall, on or before February 1 of each year,
prepare and submit to the Director of the Legislative Counsel
Bureau for submission to the Legislature, or to the Legislative
Commission when the Legislature is not in regular session, a report
outlining the activities of public agencies with respect to the
operation of unmanned aerial vehicles in this State.
4. The Department shall adopt regulations prescribing the
public purposes for which a public agency may operate an
unmanned aerial vehicle that is registered with the Department
pursuant to this section, including, without limitation:
(a) The provision of fire services.
(b) The provision of emergency medical services.
(c) The protection of a critical facility that is public property.
(d) Search and rescue operations conducted for persons and
property in distress.
5. The regulations adopted by the Department pursuant to
subsection 4 must include provisions that:
(a) Authorize, as a public purpose, a public agency to operate an
unmanned aerial vehicle that is registered with the Department in
order to conduct a scheduled inspection to ensure compliance with
building or fire codes or laws, ordinances, regulations or rules
adopting or establishing building or fire codes that are enforced by
the public agency.
(b) Prohibit a public agency from collecting any photograph,
image or recording through the operation of an unmanned aerial
vehicle during a scheduled inspection described in paragraph (a). If
any photograph, image or recording is collected in violation of such
a regulation or if any other information is collected through the
operation of an unmanned aerial vehicle during such a scheduled
inspection, the photograph, image, recording or other information:
(1) Is not admissible and must not be disclosed in any
judicial, administrative or other adjudicatory proceeding other than a
proceeding relating to the purpose of the scheduled inspection; and
(2) May not be used to establish reasonable suspicion or
probable cause as the basis for the investigation or prosecution of a
crime or other offense.
6. In addition to the regulations adopted pursuant to subsection
4, the Department shall adopt regulations to establish:
(a) A list of countries, businesses and entities from which a
public agency or law enforcement agency shall not purchase or
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 17 –
acquire any unmanned aerial vehicle or other equipment or service
relating to the operation of an unmanned aerial vehicle; and
(b) A list of unmanned aerial vehicles and other related
equipment or services that a public agency or law enforcement
agency shall not operate, purchase or acquire.
7. The lists established pursuant to subsection 6 must include,
without limitation:
(a) Any country, business or entity identified by the Secretary of
Defense of the United States Department of Defense pursuant to
Section 1260H of the William M. (Mac) Thornberry National
Defense Authorization Act for Fiscal Year 2021, Public Law 116-
283, any amendments thereto or any subsequent federal law
establishing such a list;
(b) Any unmanned aerial vehicle or other equipment or service
relating to the operation of an unmanned aerial vehicle sold,
manufactured or distributed by an entity identified by the Secretary
of Defense of the United States Department of Defense pursuant to
Section 1260H of the William M. (Mac) Thornberry National
Defense Authorization Act for Fiscal Year 2021, Public Law 116-
283, any amendments thereto or any subsequent federal law
establishing such a list;
(c) Any hardware, software, vendor or service prohibited from
being used by a state agency in Nevada by a regulation, guideline or
policy adopted by the Governor’s Technology Office [of the Chief
Information Officer] within the Office of the Governor pursuant to
NRS 242.111 and 242.115; and
(d) Any other unmanned aerial vehicle or other equipment or
service relating to the operation of an unmanned aerial vehicle, as
determined by the Department.
Sec. 28. NRS 603A.210 is hereby amended to read as follows:
603A.210 1. A data collector that maintains records which
contain personal information of a resident of this State shall
implement and maintain reasonable security measures to protect
those records from unauthorized access, acquisition, destruction,
use, modification or disclosure.
2. If a data collector is a governmental agency and maintains
records which contain personal information of a resident of this
State, the data collector shall, to the extent practicable, with respect
to the collection, dissemination and maintenance of those records,
comply with the current version of the CIS Controls as published by
the Center for Internet Security, Inc. or its successor organization, or
corresponding standards adopted by the National Institute of
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 18 –
Standards and Technology of the United States Department of
Commerce.
3. A contract for the disclosure of the personal information of a
resident of this State which is maintained by a data collector must
include a provision requiring the person to whom the information is
disclosed to implement and maintain reasonable security measures
to protect those records from unauthorized access, acquisition,
destruction, use, modification or disclosure.
4. If a state or federal law requires a data collector to provide
greater protection to records that contain personal information of a
resident of this State which are maintained by the data collector and
the data collector is in compliance with the provisions of that state
or federal law, the data collector shall be deemed to be in
compliance with the provisions of this section.
5. The Office of Information Security of the Governor’s
Technology Office [of the Chief Information Officer] within the
Office of the Governor shall create, maintain and make available to
the public a list of controls and standards with which the State is
required to comply pursuant to any federal law, regulation or
framework that also satisfy the controls and standards set forth in
subsection 2.
Sec. 29. NRS 603A.215 is hereby amended to read as follows:
603A.215 1. If a data collector doing business in this State
accepts a payment card in connection with a sale of goods or
services, the data collector shall comply with the current version of
the Payment Card Industry (PCI) Data Security Standard, as adopted
by the PCI Security Standards Council or its successor organization,
with respect to those transactions, not later than the date for
compliance set forth in the Payment Card Industry (PCI) Data
Security Standard or by the PCI Security Standards Council or its
successor organization.
2. A data collector doing business in this State to whom
subsection 1 does not apply shall not:
(a) Transfer any personal information through an electronic,
nonvoice transmission other than a facsimile to a person outside of
the secure system of the data collector unless the data collector uses
encryption to ensure the security of electronic transmission; or
(b) Move any data storage device containing personal
information beyond the logical or physical controls of the data
collector, its data storage contractor or, if the data storage device is
used by or is a component of a multifunctional device, a person who
assumes the obligation of the data collector to protect personal
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 19 –
information, unless the data collector uses encryption to ensure the
security of the information.
3. A data collector shall not be liable for damages for a breach
of the security of the system data if:
(a) The data collector is in compliance with this section; and
(b) The breach is not caused by the gross negligence or
intentional misconduct of the data collector, its officers, employees
or agents.
4. The requirements of this section do not apply to:
(a) A telecommunication provider acting solely in the role of
conveying the communications of other persons, regardless of the
mode of conveyance used, including, without limitation:
(1) Optical, wire line and wireless facilities;
(2) Analog transmission; and
(3) Digital subscriber line transmission, voice over Internet
protocol and other digital transmission technology.
(b) Data transmission over a secure, private communication
channel for:
(1) Approval or processing of negotiable instruments,
electronic fund transfers or similar payment methods; or
(2) Issuance of reports regarding account closures due to
fraud, substantial overdrafts, abuse of automatic teller machines or
related information regarding a customer.
5. As used in this section:
(a) “Data storage device” means any device that stores
information or data from any electronic or optical medium,
including, but not limited to, computers, cellular telephones,
magnetic tape, electronic computer drives and optical computer
drives, and the medium itself.
(b) “Encryption” means the protection of data in electronic or
optical form, in storage or in transit, using:
(1) An encryption technology that has been adopted by an
established standards setting body, including, but not limited to, the
Federal Information Processing Standards issued by the National
Institute of Standards and Technology, which renders such data
indecipherable in the absence of associated cryptographic keys
necessary to enable decryption of such data;
(2) Appropriate management and safeguards of
cryptographic keys to protect the integrity of the encryption using
guidelines promulgated by an established standards setting body,
including, but not limited to, the National Institute of Standards and
Technology; and
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 20 –
(3) Any other technology or method identified by the Office
of Information Security of the Governor’s Technology Office [of
the Chief Information Officer] within the Office of the Governor in
regulations adopted pursuant to NRS 603A.217.
(c) “Facsimile” means an electronic transmission between two
dedicated fax machines using Group 3 or Group 4 digital formats
that conform to the International Telecommunications Union T.4 or
T.38 standards or computer modems that conform to the
International Telecommunications Union T.31 or T.32 standards.
The term does not include onward transmission to a third device
after protocol conversion, including, but not limited to, any data
storage device.
(d) “Multifunctional device” means a machine that incorporates
the functionality of devices, which may include, without limitation,
a printer, copier, scanner, facsimile machine or electronic mail
terminal, to provide for the centralized management, distribution or
production of documents.
(e) “Payment card” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 205.602.
(f) “Telecommunication provider” has the meaning ascribed to it
in NRS 704.027.
Sec. 30. NRS 603A.217 is hereby amended to read as follows:
603A.217 Upon receipt of a well-founded petition, the
Governor’s Technology Office [of the Chief Information Officer]
within the Office of the Governor may, pursuant to chapter 233B of
NRS, adopt regulations which identify alternative methods or
technologies which may be used to encrypt data pursuant to
NRS 603A.215.
Sec. 31. Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary,
a person who has been appointed to or is otherwise incumbent in the
position of Deputy Chief of the Office of Information Security as of
July 1, 2025, is in the classified service of the State and must remain
in the classified service of the State until he or she vacates the
position.
Sec. 32. The Legislative Counsel shall:
1. In preparing the reprint and supplements to the Nevada
Revised Statutes, appropriately change any references to an officer,
agency or other entity whose name is changed or whose
responsibilities are transferred pursuant to the provisions of this act
to refer to the appropriate officer, agency or other entity.
2. In preparing supplements to the Nevada Administrative
Code, appropriately change any references to an officer, agency or
other entity whose name is changed or whose responsibilities are
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 21 –
transferred pursuant to the provisions of this act to refer to the
appropriate officer, agency or other entity.
Sec. 33. 1. Any administrative regulations adopted by an
officer or an agency whose name has been changed or whose
responsibilities have been transferred pursuant to the provisions of
this act to another officer or agency remain in force until amended
by the officer or agency to which the responsibility for the adoption
of the regulations has been transferred.
2. Any contracts or other agreements entered into by an officer
or agency whose name has been changed or whose responsibilities
have been transferred pursuant to the provisions of this act to
another officer or agency are binding upon the officer or agency to
which the responsibility for the administration of the provisions of
the contract or other agreement has been transferred. Such contracts
and other agreements may be enforced by the officer or agency to
which the responsibility for the enforcement of the provisions of the
contract or other agreement has been transferred.
3. Any action taken by an officer or agency whose name has
been changed or whose responsibilities have been transferred
pursuant to the provisions of this act to another officer or agency
remains in effect as if taken by the officer or agency to which the
responsibility for the enforcement of such actions has been
transferred.
Sec. 34. NRS 233F.015, 233F.055, 233F.059, 242.013,
242.031 and 242.045 are hereby repealed.
Sec. 35. This act becomes effective on July 1, 2025.
20 ~~~~~ 25
-
83rd Session (2025)